Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-8,150
Student loan repayment assistance; application; deadlines.

Applications for student loan repayment assistance must be submitted no later than June 10, 2023, and no later than June 10 of each year thereafter, on a form developed by the department. The department shall determine whether to approve or deny each application and shall notify each applicant of such determination no later than September 10, 2023, and no later than September 10 of each year thereafter. Repayment assistance awarded under the program shall be paid, in whole or in part as provided in section 79-8,151, no later than November 10, 2023, and no later than November 10 of each year thereafter.

Laws 2022, LB1218, § 5.
July 21, 2022